District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.11

Repealed

Pleadings and accompanying documents.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 310, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 311, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(11), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-343.10.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.10

D.C. Law 16-137, rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) A petitioner seeking to establish or modify a support order or to determine parentage in a proceeding under this chapter must verify the petition. Unless otherwise ordered under § 46-303.11 (nondisclosure of information in exceptional circumstances), the petition or accompanying documents must provide, so far as known, the name, residential address, and social security numbers of the obligor and the obligee, and the name, sex, residential address, social security number, and date of birth of each child for whom support is sought. The petition must be accompanied by a certified copy of any support order in effect. The petition may include any other information that may assist in locating or identifying the respondent.”
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Former § 46-303.11 has been recodified as § 46-303.12 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(12).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 311 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).